Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 27. Qualified Projects of Natural Gas Utilities.

§ 56-605.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Eligible infrastructure” means storage, compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, transmission and distribution facilities to be used in the delivery of natural gas, or supplemental or substitute forms of gas sources by a natural gas utility.

“Eligible infrastructure development costs” or “EIDC” for a qualifying project shall be comprised of the investment in eligible infrastructure and the following:

Return on the investment. In calculating the return on investment, the Commission shall use the natural gas utility’s weighted average cost of capital, including the cost of debt and equity, based on its regulatory capital structure used in determining
the natural gas utility’s base rates in effect during the construction period of the eligible infrastructure development project. The investment will be multiplied by the weighted average cost of capital to determine the return
on investment;

A revenue conversion factor. Such factor, including income taxes and an allowance for bad debt expense, shall be applied to the required operating income resulting from the eligible infrastructure development costs;

Operating and maintenance expense. The amount of operating and maintenance expense utilized in the utility’s calculations of justifiable new business plant investment shall be consistent with the natural gas utility’s standard line extension tariff provisions;

Depreciation. In calculating depreciation, the Commission shall use the natural gas utility’s currently approved depreciation rates applicable to each general plant account; and

Property taxes.The foregoing shall be reduced by a base non-gas revenue credit comprised of the non-gas revenue received by the natural gas utility from providing sales or transportation service, or both, to (i) the customer occupying the qualifying project
and (ii) any other customer of the natural gas utility served directly from the subject eligible infrastructure that initiates natural gas service before the Commission issues an order establishing or confirming customer rates
in a rate case using the cost of service methodology set forth in § 56-235.2 or a performance-based regulation plan authorized by § 56-235.6 which rates include recovery of costs deferred under this chapter.“Investment” means costs
incurred to deploy eligible infrastructure including planning, development, and construction costs and, if applicable, an allowance for funds used during construction. In calculating the allowance for funds used during construction,
the Commission shall use the natural gas utility’s regulatory capital structure as determined in subdivision 1 of the definition of “eligible infrastructure development costs.”“Natural gas utility” means an investor-owned public
service company engaged in the business of furnishing natural gas service to the public.“Person” means natural persons, firms, associations, cooperatives, corporations, limited liability companies, business trusts, partnerships,
and limited liability partnerships.“Qualifying project” means an economic development project requiring natural gas service as to which the natural gas utility has made a good faith determination that the following criteria are
satisfied:

1.
The location of the proposed project is in an area where adequate natural gas infrastructure is not available;

2.
The eligible infrastructure will provide opportunities for increased natural gas usage and economic development benefits in the area to be directly served by the subject eligible infrastructure in addition to those provided
by the subject project;

3.
Either (i) the person proposing to develop the project or the person that will occupy the proposed project shall provide, prior to the initiation of service, a binding commitment, in the form of a service agreement, precedent
agreement, memorandum of understanding, or otherwise, to the natural gas utility regarding capacity needed for a period of at least five years from the date gas is made available, provided that such commitment covers a level of service
no less than 50 percent of the capacity of the facilities proposed to be constructed by the natural gas utility to serve such project or (ii) the natural gas utility receives a financial guaranty from the Commonwealth or an agency
or subdivision thereof, the governing body of the locality in which the project is located or an agency or subdivision thereof, or from a developer or any other person other than the proposed occupant of the project, in the amount
of at least 50 percent of the estimated investment to be made by the natural gas utility in the proposed project, and otherwise in form and substance satisfactory to the natural gas utility. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing,
such financial guaranty may be in the form of a letter of credit issued by a bank or other lending institution licensed to do business in the Commonwealth. Any financial guaranty provided to the natural gas utility shall be released
upon the receipt by the natural gas utility of a binding commitment meeting the requirements of clause (i) from a person proposing to develop the project or a person that will occupy the project;

4.
The natural gas utility has reasonably and in good faith negotiated with the developer of the project or the person that will occupy the proposed project in an attempt to reach agreement on a commitment for the entire aid
to construction otherwise required to cover the cost of the necessary eligible infrastructure; and

5.
The projected non-gas revenues from the proposed project will not be sufficient to cover the cost of service associated with the necessary eligible infrastructure after accounting for any aid to construction contributed
by the developer of the project or the person that will occupy the proposed project.A qualifying project may consist of multiple persons proposed to be served through common eligible infrastructure, provided those persons each satisfy
the requirement of a service commitment for at least five years from the date gas is made available and collectively they satisfy the capacity commitment of at least 50 percent. For purposes of this chapter and notwithstanding the
foregoing, a qualifying project shall not include an economic development project applicable to customers to be served under a special rate or contract approved by the Commission pursuant to the provisions of § 56-235.6 or industrial
customers to be provided service pursuant to a negotiated rate permitted by a tariff approved by the Commission.

History.
2012, cc. 51, 202.

§ 56-606.
Infrastructure development.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary when the requirements set forth in the definition of qualifying project have been satisfied:

The natural gas utility certificated to serve the subject service territory may construct the necessary facilities subject to the provisions of this chapter; and

The natural gas utility constructing eligible infrastructure pursuant to subdivision 1 shall be permitted to recover the EIDC necessary to develop the eligible infrastructure for the designated qualifying project or projects in future rates as provided
in §§ 56-607 and 56-608. The utility shall maintain the burden of demonstrating that the criteria set forth in this chapter have been satisfied.

History.
2012, cc. 51, 202.

§ 56-607.
Application and administration.

A natural gas utility shall account for the actual monthly EIDC incurred on the cumulative investment in eligible infrastructure in excess of any aid to construction contributed by the developer of the project or the person that will occupy the proposed
project as a deferred cost until new base rates and charges that incorporate EIDC become effective for the natural gas utility, following a Commission order establishing or confirming customer rates in a rate case using the cost
of service methodology set forth in § 56-235.2 or a performance-based regulation plan authorized by § 56-235.6. Such deferred cost shall be accounted for as a regulatory asset and shall not be subject to write-off or write-down
by the Commission in an earnings test filing made pursuant to Commission rules governing utility rate increases and annual informational filings.

The investment for all qualifying projects of a natural gas utility in any year shall not exceed one percent of the natural gas utility’s net plant investment that was utilized in establishing base rates in the natural gas utility’s most recent rate case.
The provisions of this subsection shall not apply, however, to any natural gas utility serving fewer than 2,000 residential customers and fewer than 350 commercial and industrial customers in the year in which it makes an investment
for qualifying projects.

Deferral of costs recovered pursuant to this chapter shall have no effect on the recovery of any other cost by the natural gas utility and shall not be included in any computation relative to a performance-based regulation plan revenue-sharing mechanism.

History.
2012, cc. 51, 202; 2013, c. 284; 2017, cc. 253, 780.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 284 added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 253 and 780 are identical, and substituted “2,000 residential customers” for “1,000 residential customers” and “350 commercial and industrial” for “250 commercial and industrial” in subsection B.

§ 56-608.
Certain contracts deemed prudent and reasonable.

The transportation and storage quantities of the contracts entered into by a natural gas utility for the acquisition of upstream pipeline capacity to meet the reasonably anticipated service requirements of the qualifying projects and other service requirements
to be served through the eligible infrastructure shall be deemed prudent and reasonable.

History.
2012, cc. 51, 202.

§ 56-609.
Upstream natural gas supply infrastructure projects.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Eligible natural gas supply infrastructure costs” includes the investment in eligible natural gas supply infrastructure projects and the following:

Return on the investment. In calculating the return on investment, the Commission shall use the natural gas utility’s then in effect weighted average cost of capital, including the cost of debt and equity, based on its regulatory capital structure used
in determining the natural gas utility’s base rates. The investment will be multiplied by the weighted average cost of capital to determine the return on investment;

A revenue conversion factor. Such factor, including income taxes, shall be applied to the required operating income resulting from the eligible natural gas supply infrastructure costs;

Operating and maintenance expense, which includes the amount of operating and maintenance expense utilized in production wells, processing the gas produced, and gathering, transmission, and distribution lines delivering the gas to a pipeline or distribution
system;

Depreciation. In calculating depreciation, the Commission shall use the natural gas utility’s current depreciation rates for investments in distribution infrastructure, as set out by appropriate asset class. The utility shall propose a basis for recovering
for the depreciation or depletion of investments in other asset classes in the natural gas supply investment plan, including investments in natural gas reserves that will deplete based on their useful life or of associated
facilities that may be retired upon depletion of natural gas reserves;

Property tax, severance tax, and any other taxes or government fees associated with production and transmission of natural gas; and

Carrying costs on the over-recovery or under-recovery of the eligible natural gas supply infrastructure costs. In calculating the carrying costs, the Commission shall use the natural gas utility’s regulatory capital structure as determined in subdivision
1 of this definition.“Eligible natural gas supply infrastructure projects” means capital investments in natural gas reserves and upstream pipelines and facilities that, alone or in combination with other projects or strategies,
offer reasonably anticipated benefits to customers and markets, which benefits mean (i) savings in the delivered cost of gas versus long-term forward market projections available to the natural gas utility at the time of
the capital investment or other alternatives, (ii) a reduction in the utility’s overall portfolio price volatility, (iii) reduction in the utility’s overall supply risk, or (iv) any combination of the savings or reductions
described in clauses (i), (ii), and (iii). Any such customer benefit benchmarks shall be outlined in the natural gas utility’s filings with the Commission pursuant to this section.“Investment” means actual costs incurred
on eligible natural gas supply infrastructure projects, including planning, development, and construction costs; actual costs of infrastructure associated therewith; and an allowance for funds used during construction.
In calculating the allowance for funds used during construction, the Commission shall use the natural gas utility’s actual regulatory capital structure as determined in subdivision 1 of the definition of eligible natural
gas supply infrastructure costs.“Natural gas reserves and upstream pipelines and facilities” means investments in natural gas reserves, production facilities (including equipment required to prepare the natural gas for
use), gathering, transmission, and, within the natural gas utility’s certificated service territory, any distribution pipelines necessary to deliver the reserves, and above-ground and below-ground storage used in the delivery
of gas to existing natural gas transmission pipelines or distribution systems.“Natural gas supply investment plan” means a plan filed by a natural gas utility that identifies proposed eligible natural gas supply infrastructure
projects and its development of those projects with or without a third party.

A natural gas utility shall have the right to recover eligible natural gas supply infrastructure costs on an ongoing basis through the gas cost component of the utility’s rate structure or other recovery mechanism approved by the Commission, provided
that any such mechanism shall properly allocate costs. Natural gas utilities using the cost of service methodology set forth in § 56-235.2 or a performance-based regulation plan authorized by § 56-235.6 shall be eligible to file
a plan. The plan shall include a timeline for the investment and completion of the proposed eligible natural gas supply infrastructure projects; provide for an estimated schedule for recovery of the related eligible natural gas
supply infrastructure costs through the gas cost component of the utility’s rate structure or other mechanism, including proposed depreciation rates for investments in non-distribution asset classes and how any revenue gains from
the use of the pipelines by third parties will be used to offset eligible natural gas supply infrastructure costs; and demonstrate that the plan is in the public interest with due consideration to providing a portion of the utility’s
delivered supply at prices at or below the long-term projections as available and defined in the natural gas utility’s filing, or reduction in the utility’s overall supply risk, or reduction in the utility’s overall portfolio price
volatility, or a combination thereof. No project may provide an annual volume of natural gas that exceeds 12.5 percent of the natural gas utility’s annual firm sales demand, and no combination of projects may provide an annual
volume of natural gas that exceeds 25 percent of the natural gas utility’s annual firm sales demand. The natural gas utility’s weather-normalized firm sales demand for the calendar year preceding the application shall be deemed
to establish the annual firm sales demand for the purposes of calculating the volume and volumetric limits of projects. In no case shall any investment in reserves exceed 20 years. The Commission shall approve such a plan upon
a finding that it is in the public interest after notice and an opportunity for hearing in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

In addition to the items included in the plan as specified in subsection B, the plan may provide the utility with an option to receive the gas or sell the gas at market prices. A utility proposing this option as part of its plan shall propose how any
revenue gains from the sale of the gas will be used to reduce the cost of gas to its customers. The Commission shall approve or deny, within 180 days, a natural gas utility’s initial application for a natural gas supply infrastructure
plan. A plan filed pursuant to this section shall not require the filing of rate case schedules. The Commission shall approve or deny, within 120 days, a natural gas utility’s application to amend a previously approved plan. If
the Commission denies such a plan or amendment, it shall set forth with specificity the reasons for such denial, and the utility shall have the right to refile, without prejudice, an amended plan or amendment within 60 days, and
the Commission shall thereafter have 60 days to approve or deny the amended plan or amendment. If the plan is filed as part of a general rate case using the cost of service methodology set forth in § 56-235.2 or a performance-based
regulation plan authorized by § 56-235.6, then the Commission shall approve or deny the plan concurrent with or as part of the general rate case decision.

No other revenue requirement or ratemaking issues shall be examined in consideration of the initial plan filed pursuant to the provisions of this section.

A gas utility with an approved natural gas supply infrastructure plan shall annually file a report of the eligible natural gas supply infrastructure investment made, the eligible natural gas supply infrastructure costs incurred and the amount of such
costs recovered, the volume of gas delivered to customers or sold to third parties during the 12-month reporting period, and an analysis of the price of gas delivered to the natural gas utility customers and the market cost of
gas during the 12-month period. However, such analysis shall not affect a gas utility’s right to recover all eligible natural gas supply infrastructure costs as set forth in subsection B. The report shall also identify the balance
of over-recovery or under-recovery of the eligible natural gas supply infrastructure costs at the end of the reporting period and the projected investment to be made, the projected infrastructure costs to be incurred, and the projected
costs to be recovered during the next 12-month reporting period.

Costs recovered pursuant to this section shall be in addition to all other costs that the natural gas utility is permitted to recover and shall not be considered an offset to other Commission-approved costs of service or revenue requirements.

History.
2014, cc. 467, 507.